Washington statutes.
RCW 19.178.080

Continuing business prohibited—Exception.

(1) No person may continue to conduct a going out of business sale beyond the ending date listed in the notice of the sale.

(2) No person after conducting a going out of business sale may remain in business under any of the same ownership, or under the same or substantially the same trade name, or continue to offer for sale the same type of merchandise for a period of one year after the ending date of the sale unless the continuing business location was in operation before recording the notice for the closing business location.

(3) For the purposes of this section, if a business entity that is prohibited from continuing a business under this section reformulates itself as a new entity or as an individual, whether by sale, merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, dissolution, or other transaction, for the purpose of continuing the business or profiting from the business, the successor entity or individual is considered the same person as the original entity. If an individual who is prohibited from continuing a business under this section forms a new business entity to continue the business, participate in the business, or profit from the business, that entity is considered the same person as the individual.

[ 1993 c 456 s 10.]